Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1946
Resignation.

(a) A member may resign at any time.

(b) The resignation of a member does not relieve the member from any obligations the member may have to the corporation as a result of obligations incurred or commitments made prior to resignation.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 46.